Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB852.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 160.463 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The school board of each public school system shall direct its superintendent to
publish the complete annual financial statement and the school report card annually:
(a) In the newspaper of the largest general circulation in the county;
(b) Electronically on a website[Web site] of the school district; or
(c) By printed copy at a prearranged site at the main branch of the public library
within the school district.
(2) If publication on a website[Web site] of the school district or by printed copy at the
public library is chosen, the superintendent shall be directed to publish notification
in the newspaper of the largest circulation in the county as to the location where the
document can be viewed by the public.
(3) The notification shall include the address of the library or the electronic address of
the website[Web site] where the documents can be viewed.
(4) Each system's financial statements shall be prepared and presented on a basis
consistent with that of the other systems.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 3/3/2026 1:43 PM Jacketed